Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.036

Health information—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 41.05.039 through 41.05.046 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Director" means the director of the state health care authority under this chapter.

(2) "Exchange" means the methods or medium by which health care information may be electronically and securely exchanged among authorized providers, payors, and patients within Washington state.

(3) "Health care provider" or "provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.

(4) "Health data provider" means an organization that is a primary source for health-related data for Washington residents, including but not limited to:

(a) The children's health immunizations linkages and development profile immunization registry provided by the department of health pursuant to chapter 43.70 RCW;

(b) Commercial laboratories providing medical laboratory testing results;

(c) Prescription drugs clearinghouses, such as the national patient health information network; and

(d) Diagnostic imaging centers.

(5) "Lead organization" means a private sector organization or organizations designated by the director to lead development of processes, guidelines, and standards under chapter 300, Laws of 2009.

(6) "Payor" means public purchasers, as defined in this section, carriers licensed under chapters 48.20, 48.21, 48.44, 48.46, and 48.62 RCW, and the Washington state health insurance pool established in chapter 48.41 RCW.

(7) "Public purchaser" means the department of social and health services, the department of labor and industries, and the health care authority.

(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 57; 2009 c 300 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—Report—Agency transfer—References to head of health care authority—Draft legislation—2011 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 74.09.010.

Finding—2009 c 300: "The legislature finds that:

(1) The inability to securely share critical health information between practitioners inhibits the delivery of safe, efficient care, as evidenced by:

(a) Adverse drug events that result in an average of seven hundred seventy thousand injuries and deaths each year; and

(b) Duplicative services that add to costs and jeopardize patient well-being;

(2) Consumers are unable to act as fully informed participants in their care unless they have ready access to their own health information;

(3) The blue ribbon commission on health care costs and access found that the development of a system to provide electronic access to patient information anywhere in the state was a key to improving health care; and

(4) In 2005, the legislature established a health information infrastructure advisory board to develop a strategy for the adoption and use of health information technologies that are consistent with emerging national standards and promote interoperability of health information systems." [ 2009 c 300 s 1.]